California, session 20252026, AB1248.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) It is essential that prospective and current tenants have a clear and complete understanding of the total monthly cost of renting a home. Traditionally, this has been accomplished by landlords advertising and charging a single amount for rent that covers all housing services provided to the tenant.(b) Instead of advertising and charging tenants a single amount for rent, some landlords break down the amount that tenants pay into smaller amounts, such as by charging an amount labeled “rent” plus various fees. Tenants may be surprised to be charged required fees on top of their rent, including “convenience fees” to pay rent online, broker fees, utility connectivity fees, and even so-called “January fees” charged for no clear reason at the beginning of a new calendar year. Sometimes these fees purport to cover services that the law requires landlords to provide, such as pest control fees despite the landlord’s obligation to maintain the rental unit pest-free.(c) By enhancing transparency and predictability in rental housing costs, this act seeks to promote housing stability, foster trust between tenants and landlords, and create a level playing field among landlords.SEC. 2. Section 1950.2 is added to the Civil Code, to read:1950.2. (a) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Housing services” means all services provided by or on behalf of a landlord related or connected to the use, occupancy, or enjoyment of residential real property, or that are required to be provided by law or are a condition of tenancy in the residential real property, including, but not limited to, trash collection, electrical service, water service, sewer service, gas service, other utilities, elevator service, storage, parking, facilities, access to common areas, repairs, maintenance, heat, hot water, pest control, security, or any other benefits, privileges, or services, whether express or implied.(2) “Optional housing service” means a service including, but not limited to, a parking space, event space, storage space, use of a laundry machine, or similar, that is all of the following:(A) Not required to be provided by a residential landlord to a tenant by local, state, or other applicable law.(B) Not a condition of the tenancy, required by the landlord or landlord’s agent as subject to a required fee or charge, or offered as one of two or more options when selecting at least one of the options is required.(C) Freely selectable or rejectable by the tenant on an opt-in basis, with no adverse action or impact to the tenant.(D) Cancelable by the tenant with no more than 30 days’ notice to the landlord, with no adverse action or impact to the tenant.(E) Reasonably available to the tenant from a source other than the landlord or landlord’s agent.(F) Not within or physically connected to the tenant’s dwelling unit.(G) Not unilaterally cancelable by the landlord, unless the tenant has failed to pay the fee for 30 days past the due date or the landlord is no longer offering the service to all tenants.(3) “Ratio utility billing system” means the allocation of utilities including, but not limited to, trash, water, water heating, sewer, natural gas, liquid propane gas, electricity, or other utility costs to tenants through any billing method other than individual meters, submeters, or a flat fee.(4) “Required fee or charge” means a fee or charge that is required by the landlord or landlord’s agent to be paid to, or for the benefit of, the landlord or landlord’s agent for use or occupancy of the residential real property, for housing services, or as a condition of the tenancy.(b) On or after April 1, 2026, a landlord or landlord’s agent who advertises, displays, or offers residential property for rent shall include in any advertisement, display, or offer both of the following:(1) The price required to be paid to or for the benefit of the landlord or landlord’s agent for use or occupancy of the residential real property and housing services, or as a condition of the tenancy, including all required fees or charges, except as provided in subdivision (c).(A) The price shall be clear and conspicuous, and significantly more prominent in type size, color, and placement than the amount of any fee or charge included in the price.(B) For any dwelling unit where submeters are used to charge a tenant separately for water service pursuant to Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 1954.201), the price shall include the fee or charge for water service by providing the estimate of the monthly bill for water service described in subdivision (b) of Section 1954.204.(2) (A) A description of all available optional housing services and associated fees for each optional housing service.(B) The landlord or landlord’s agent shall not condition an offer to rent, a tenancy, or the terms of a tenancy on whether a tenant chooses any optional housing services or on whether the tenant later cancels any optional housing services.(c) A landlord or landlord’s agent may exclude both of the following fees or charges from the advertised, displayed, or offered price:(1) The amount of any refundable security or application screening fee, as provided in Sections 1950.5 and 1950.6, if it is clearly and conspicuously disclosed in all advertisements, displays, and offers and in the rental agreement.(2) Fees or charges for individually metered utilities that a tenant pays directly to a third-party utility provider pursuant to a contractual agreement between the tenant and the utility provider.(d) This section does not prevent a landlord from recovering a charge for lost key replacement or damages to the property caused by the tenant or the tenant’s guests or as otherwise permitted by law.(e) A landlord or landlord’s agent shall not use a ratio utility billing system to allocate, demand, or collect fees or charges, except for fees or charges for water or sewer service, as provided in subdivision (f).(f) A landlord or landlord’s agent shall not allocate, demand, or collect from a tenant fees or charges for water or sewer service through the use of a ratio utility billing system, unless all of the following requirements are met:(1) The fee or charge for water or sewer usage consists only of fees or charges assessed for the property by the water or sewer provider.(2) If common areas, landscape irrigation systems, or other areas under the control of the landlord are served by a master water meter that also provides water to dwelling units covered by this subdivision, the landlord or landlord’s agent shall deduct the greater of the following amounts before water or sewer costs are divided among the dwelling units:(A) Twenty percent of the total water or sewer bills.(B) The actual cost of water or sewer usage for all common areas, landscaping, and all other areas under the control of the landlord, if all common areas, landscaping, and all other areas under the control of the landlord are separately metered or submetered for water.(C) The actual cost of water or sewer usage for all landscaping plus 10 percent of the total water or sewer bills, if all water used for landscaping is separately metered or submetered and water used for other common areas or areas under the control of the landlord are not separately metered or submetered.(3) For new tenancies beginning on or after April 1, 2026:(A) The advertised, displayed, or offered price for a dwelling unit described in subdivision (b) includes the highest monthly cost of water or sewer charges over the prior 12 months or prior calendar year for the unit or for a unit of similar size on the property.(B) Before accepting any application fee, security deposit, or other payment from a prospective tenant, the landlord or landlord’s agent does both of the following:(i) Provides the prospective tenant a paper or electronic copy of the two most recent water or sewer bills for the property and identifies the amounts the prospective tenant would have paid for the dwelling unit’s share of those bills, except in the case of new construction if prior bills do not exist.(ii) Provides the prospective tenant a paper or electronic statement that describes all of the following:(I) The percentages of the water or sewer costs that are allocated to tenants and to the landlord, as described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (f).(II) The method or formula used to allocate water or sewer costs among tenants.(III) A statement that tenants may inspect any documents or information as provided in paragraphs (4) and (5).(C) The rental agreement clearly and conspicuously discloses the information described in subparagraphs (A) and (B).(4) Upon written request by a tenant or a tenant’s representative, the landlord permits a tenant or a tenant’s representative to inspect all water or sewer bills, the method or formula used to allocate water or sewer costs to dwelling units, and the percentages of the water or sewer costs that are allocated to dwelling units and to the landlord. The landlord is only required to comply with four requests per dwelling unit per 12-month period.(5) Upon written request by a tenant or a tenant’s representative, the landlord provides the total number of dwelling units billed each month and the number of bedrooms in each unit.(6) During the course of a tenancy, the landlord or landlord’s agent does not alter the percentage of water or sewer costs that are allocated between the landlord and the tenants or the method or formula used to allocate water or sewer costs to the tenant in a way that increases the tenant’s share of those costs. A change in the number of occupants of a tenant’s unit may result in a different cost to the tenant using a consistent formula.(7) The fee or charge to any tenant is not greater as a result of vacancy in a dwelling unit on the property or the presence of other tenants at the property who do not pay for water or sewer pursuant to this subdivision.(8) The use of a ratio utility billing system is not prohibited by local law.(9) The dwelling unit does not use submeters to charge a tenant separately for water service pursuant to Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 1954.201).(g) For dwelling units and tenancies subject to the gross rental rate increase limits of Section 1947.12, any new required fee or charge, new fee or charge for optional housing services that were previously provided in exchange for the tenant’s payment of rent, and any increases to a required or optional fee or charge shall, when combined with any other increases in the gross rental rate, comply with subdivision (a) of Section 1947.12. This subdivision is declarative of existing law.(1) A landlord or landlord’s agent may charge a new required fee or charge for water if they are converting from a ratio utility billing system to the use of water submeters.(2) A decrease in housing services is an increase in the gross rental rate. This paragraph is declarative of existing law.(h) A landlord or landlord’s agent who operates a ratio utility billing system in compliance with this section does not violate subdivision (a) of Section 1947.12, if water or sewer fees or charges increase based on actual water or sewer usage or rates, so long as the landlord or landlord’s agent has complied with Section 1101.5.(i) A landlord or landlord’s agent shall not charge any fee or charge, except for required fees and charges and fees and charges for optional housing services.(j) A landlord or landlord’s agent shall not use a tenant’s failure to pay for an optional housing service as a basis for termination of tenancy.(k) (1) Notwithstanding Section 1479, a payment received from, or on behalf of, a tenant shall be applied first to the current month’s rent, then to any outstanding rental debt that is less than 12 months past due, then to any other obligation due under the rental agreement other than rent, then to any other obligation between the two parties.(2) A late fee shall not be charged or collected for nonpayment or late payment of a previously charged late fee. This paragraph does not authorize the collection of late fees where they are not otherwise permitted by law.(3) (A) For the purposes of this subdivision, “rent” means periodic payment and all nonmonetary consideration to or for the benefit of the landlord in exchange for the use or occupancy of a dwelling unit and premises and the provision of housing services under a rental contract or agreement, oral, written, or implied.(B) For the purposes of this subdivision, rent does not include optional housing services.(l) This section does not enlarge or diminish any ability of local government to impose or enforce any local laws or requirements upon a landlord or a landlord’s agent, that provide greater protection to tenants.(m) A landlord or landlord’s agent who violates this section shall be liable to a tenant in a civil action for all of the following:(1) Actual damages, but in no case shall the total award of actual damages be less than one thousand dollars ($1,000).(2) Injunctive and declaratory relief.(3) Reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.(4) Upon a showing that the landlord or landlord’s agent has acted willfully or with oppression, fraud, or malice, or with reckless or grossly negligent disregard of this section, three times the actual damages. An award may also be entered for punitive damages for the benefit of the tenant.(n) An action to enforce any cause of action pursuant to this section shall be commenced within three years after the cause of action accrued.(o) The provisions of this section are severable. If any provision of this section or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.(p) Any waiver of the rights under this section shall be deemed contrary to public policy and void and unenforceable. This section shall be construed liberally to effect its purpose of protecting the public.SECTION 1.Section 1950.2 is added to the Civil Code, to read:1950.2.(a)For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1)“Housing services” means all services provided by the landlord related or connected to the use or occupancy of residential real property, including, but not limited to, trash collection, electrical service, water service, sewer service, gas service, other utilities, elevator service, storage, facilities, laundry, repairs, maintenance, heat, hot water, pest control, or any other benefits, privileges, or services, whether express or implied.(2)“Ratio utility billing system” means the allocation of trash, water, sewer, natural gas, liquid propane gas, electricity, or other utility costs to tenants through any billing method other than individual meters as described in subdivision (d).(3)“Rent” means a single periodic payment and all nonmonetary consideration to or for the benefit of the landlord in exchange for the use or occupancy of a rental unit and premises and the provision of housing services under a rental contract or agreement, oral, written, or implied. “Rent” as defined in this section means “gross rental rate” as that term is used in Section 1947.12.(b)For any new residential tenancies that begin on or after January 1, 2026, a tenant shall only be obligated to pay rent and the following fees or charges:(1)The amount of any security deposit as provided in Section 1950.5, if clearly and conspicuously disclosed in all advertisements.(2)Rent stabilization fees or other similar fees or charges, other than taxes, imposed by a government, that are directly related to the tenant’s dwelling unit, to the extent a passthrough of those fees or charges is otherwise expressly authorized by statute or ordinance.(A)Rent stabilization fees or other similar fees or charges shall not exceed the actual, documented fees or charges imposed on the landlord. A landlord shall provide documentation of these fees or charges to the tenant on an annual basis.(B)Rent stabilization fees or other similar fees or charges shall not include a fee or charge for a service that is charged by a third party.(3)Fees or charges that the tenant pays directly to the landlord or landlord’s agent for submetered water in compliance with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 1954.201).(4)Fees or charges for a tenant’s late payments to the extent otherwise permitted by law.(c)For any residential tenancies that began before January 1, 2026, a tenant shall only be obligated to pay rent and the following fees or charges:(1)Fees or charges that were charged at the start of the tenancy, pursuant to the rental agreement, so long as those fees or charges do not increase over the course of the tenancy.(2)Rent stabilization fees or other similar fees or charges, other than taxes, imposed by a government that are directly related to the tenant’s dwelling unit, to the extent a passthrough of those fees is otherwise expressly authorized by statute or ordinance.(A)Rent stabilization fees or other similar fees or charges shall not exceed the actual, documented fees or charges imposed on the landlord. The landlord shall provide documentation of these fees or charges to the tenant for inspection upon request.(B)Rent stabilization fees or other similar fees or charges shall not include a fee or charge for a service that is charged by a third party.(3)Fees or charges that the tenant pays directly to the landlord or landlord’s agent for submetered water in compliance with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 1954.201).(4)Fees or charges for a tenant’s late payments to the extent otherwise permitted by law.(5)Fees or charges paid to the landlord or the landlord’s agent or billing company for the actual cost of utilities, limited to trash, water, sewer, natural gas, liquid propane gas, and electricity, including the use of any ratio utility billing system, if all of the following apply:(A)At the start of the tenancy, pursuant to the rental agreement, the landlord or their agent charged or collected such fees or charges from that tenant.(B)Neither the percentage of the utility costs that are allocated between the landlord and the tenants, nor the method or formula used to allocate utility costs among tenants, are altered in a way that increases the tenant’s share of those costs.(C)The tenant’s utility cost is not increased as a result of vacancy in the property or the presence of other tenants at the property who do not pay for utilities pursuant to this paragraph.(D)On a monthly basis, the landlord or landlord’s agent provides notice to all tenants of the applicable utility rates, actual usage, and amounts billed to the property for actual usage, as well as a clear description of the method and unit-level data used to calculate fees or charges, sufficient for each tenant to determine the accuracy of that tenant’s utility cost.(E)The actual amount of fees or charges collected for utilities over the course of one year does not exceed the actual cost of utility usage for that year.(F)Such fees or charges do not include a fee or charge for a service that is charged by a third party.(d)For residential tenancies that began before, or beginning on or after, January 1, 2026, if a tenant is given a discount on rent or fees or charges in exchange for signing a rental agreement, the rental agreement shall clearly state on the first page when the discount will end, the total amount of rent and fees or charges that the tenant will be obligated to pay when the discount ends, and the date on which the tenant will first be obligated to pay that amount. The landlord or landlord’s agent shall also provide 60 days’ notice before the date that the discount will end.(e)This section does not prevent a tenant from being required to pay individually metered utilities if the rental agreement clearly and conspicuously states that the tenant is responsible for paying utility charges, the tenant pays directly to a third-party utility provider pursuant to a contractual agreement between the household and the utility provider, or to the landlord in accordance with paragraph (3) of subdivision (b), and the tenant is required to pay for utilities only for tenant’s unit and not for common areas or other units.(f)Notwithstanding Section 1479, a payment received from, or on behalf of, a tenant shall be applied first to the current month’s rent, then to any outstanding rental debt that is less than 12 months past due, then to other fees or charges due under the rental agreement other than rent, then to any other obligation between the two parties. No late fee shall be charged or collected if the only delinquency is attributable to nonpayment or late payment of a previously charged late fee. This section does not authorize the collection of late fees where they are not otherwise permitted by law.(g)A decrease in housing services is an increase in the rent.(h)(1)A landlord or their agent who violates this section shall be liable to a tenant in a civil action for all of the following:(A)Actual damages, but in no case shall the total award of actual damages be less than one thousand dollars ($1,000).(B)Injunctive and declaratory relief.(C)Reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.(2)Upon a showing that the landlord or their agent has acted willfully or with oppression, fraud, or malice, or with reckless or grossly negligent disregard of this section, three times the actual damages. An award may also be entered for punitive damages for the benefit of the tenant.(i)An action to enforce any cause of action pursuant to this section shall be commenced within four years after the cause of action accrued.(j)(1)This section does not prevent a landlord from recovering damages to the extent otherwise permitted by law.(2)This section does not preempt a local government from imposing or enforcing any additional requirements upon a landlord or a landlord’s agent that provide greater protection to tenants.(k)The provisions of this section are severable. If any provision of this section or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.(l)Any waiver of the rights under this section shall be deemed contrary to public policy and void.